Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-2506
Recapture or disallowance of federal credit; Nebraska credit recaptured.

If a portion of any federal low-income housing tax credits taken on a qualified project is required to be recaptured or is otherwise disallowed under 26 U.S.C. 42 during the 6-year period described in subsection (2) of section 77-2503, a portion of the Nebraska affordable housing tax credits with respect to such project shall also be recaptured from the taxpayer who claimed such credits. The percentage of Nebraska affordable housing tax credits subject to recapture under this section shall be equal to the percentage of federal low-income housing tax credits subject to recapture or otherwise disallowed during such period. Any Nebraska affordable housing tax credits recaptured or disallowed under this section shall increase the tax liability of the taxpayer who claimed the credits in the year the Department of Revenue declares the tax credits to be disallowed or recaptured.

Laws 2016, LB884, § 16;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB182, § 4.